California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 under law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 105, Sec. 50.   (AB 2009)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The California Taxpayers’ Bill of Rights [50156. - 50156.18.]

50156.

The board shall administer this article. Unless the context indicates otherwise, the provisions of this article shall apply to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.1.

(a) The board shall establish the position of the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate. The advocate or his or her designee shall be responsible for facilitating resolution of fee payer complaints and problems, including any fee payer complaints regarding unsatisfactory treatment of fee payers by board employees, and staying actions where fee payers have suffered or will suffer irreparable loss as the result of those actions. Applicable statutes of limitation shall be tolled during the pendency of a stay. Any penalties and interest that would
 otherwise accrue shall not be affected by the granting of a stay.

(b) The advocate shall report directly to the executive officer of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.2.

(a) The board shall develop and implement an education and information program directed at, but not limited to, all of the following groups:

(1) Fee payers newly registered with the board.

(2) Board audit and compliance staff.

(b) The education and information program shall include all of the following:

(1) A program of written communication with newly registered fee payers explaining in simplified terms their duties and responsibilities.

(2) Participation in seminars and similar programs organized by federal, state, and local agencies.

(3) Revision of fee payer educational materials currently produced by the board that explain the most common areas of fee payer nonconformance in simplified terms.

(4) Implementation of a continuing education program for audit and compliance personnel to include the application of new legislation to fee payer activities, and areas of recurrent fee payer noncompliance or inconsistency of administration.

(c) Electronic media used to comply with this section
 shall not represent the voice, picture, or name of members of the board or the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 929, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.3.

The board shall conduct an annual hearing before the full board where industry representatives and individual fee payers are allowed to present their proposals on changes to the Underground Storage Tank Maintenance Fee Law which may further improve voluntary compliance and the relationship between fee payers and government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.4.

The board shall prepare and publish brief but comprehensive statements in simple and nontechnical language that explain procedures, remedies, and the rights and obligations of the board and fee payers. As appropriate, statements shall be provided to fee payers with the initial notice of audit, the notice of proposed additional fees, any subsequent notice of fees due, or other substantive notices. Additionally, the board shall include this language for statements in the annual fee information bulletins that are mailed to taxpayers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.5.

(a) The total amount of revenue collected or assessed pursuant to this part shall not be used for any of the following:

(1) To evaluate individual officers or employees.

(2) To impose or suggest production quotas or goals, other than quotas or goals with respect to accounts receivable.

(b) The board shall certify in its annual report submitted
 pursuant to Section 15616 of the Government Code that revenue collected or assessed is not used in a manner prohibited by subdivision (a).

(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the setting of goals and the evaluation of performance with respect to productivity and the efficient use of time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.6.

The board shall develop and implement a program that will evaluate an individual employee’s or officer’s performance with respect to his or her contact with fee payers. The development and implementation of the program shall be coordinated with the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.7.

The board shall, in cooperation with the State Water Resources Control Board, the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate, and other interested taxpayer-oriented groups, develop a plan to reduce the time required to resolve petitions for redetermination and claims for refunds. The plan shall include determination of standard timeframes and special review of cases that take more time than the appropriate standard timeframe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.8.

Procedures of the board, relating to appeals staff review conferences before a staff attorney or supervising tax auditor independent of the assessing department, shall include all of the following:

(a) Any conference shall be held at a reasonable time at a board office that is convenient to the fee payer.

(b) The conference may be recorded only if prior notice is given to the fee payer and the fee payer is entitled to receive a
 copy of the recording.

(c) The fee payer shall be informed prior to any conference that he or she has a right to have present at the conference his or her attorney, accountant, or other designated agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.9.

(a) Every fee payer is entitled to be reimbursed for any reasonable fees and expenses related to a hearing before the board if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The fee payer files a claim for the fee and expenses with the board within one year of the date the decision of the board becomes final.

(2) The board, in its sole discretion, finds that the action taken by the board staff was
 unreasonable.

(3) The board decides that the fee payer be awarded a specific amount of fees and expenses related to the hearing, in an amount determined by the board in its sole discretion.

(b) To determine whether the board staff has been unreasonable, the board shall consider whether the board staff has established that its position was substantially justified.

(c) The amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to the following:

(1) Fees and expenses incurred after the date of the notice of determination, jeopardy determination, or a claim for refunds.

(2) If the board finds that the staff was unreasonable with respect to certain issues but reasonable with respect to other
 issues, the amount of reimbursed fees and expenses shall be limited to those that relate to the issues where the staff was unreasonable.

(d) Any proposed award by the board pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be available as a public record for at least 10 days prior to the effective date of the award.

(e) The amendments to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for claims filed on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1052, Sec. 87.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.10.

(a) An officer or employee of the board acting in connection with any law administered by the board shall not knowingly authorize, require, or conduct any investigation of, or surveillance over, any person for nontax administration related purposes.

(b) Any person violating subdivision (a) shall be subject to disciplinary action in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, including dismissal from office or discharge from employment.

(c) This section shall not apply with respect to any otherwise lawful investigation concerning organized crime activities.

(d) The provisions of this section are not intended to prohibit, restrict, or prevent the exchange of information where the person is being investigated for multiple violations that include underground storage tank fee violations.

(e) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Investigation” means any oral or written inquiry directed to any person, organization, or governmental agency.

(2) “Surveillance” means the monitoring of persons, places, or events by means of electronic interception, overt or covert observations, or photography, and the use of
 informants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 177.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.11.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department, its staff, and the Attorney General pursue settlements as authorized under this section with respect to fee matters in dispute that are the subject of protests, appeals, or refund claims, consistent with a reasonable evaluation of the costs and risks associated with litigation of these matters.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), no recommendation of settlement shall be submitted to the director for approval unless and until that recommendation has been submitted by the chief counsel to the Attorney General. Within 30 days of receiving that recommendation,
 the Attorney General shall review the recommendation and advise the chief counsel, in writing, of their conclusions as to whether the recommendation is reasonable from an overall perspective. The chief counsel shall, with each recommendation of settlement submitted to the director, also submit the Attorney General’s written conclusions obtained pursuant to this paragraph.

(2) (A) A settlement of any civil fee matter in dispute involving a reduction of fee or penalties in settlement, the total of which reduction of fee and penalties in settlement does not exceed
 eleven thousand five hundred dollars ($11,500), may be approved by the director.

(B) Beginning on July 1, 2029, and each fifth fiscal year thereafter, the department shall adjust the amount specified in subparagraph (A) by increasing that amount by a percentage amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index, as calculated by the Department of Finance with the resulting amount rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100). The first adjustment pursuant to this subparagraph shall be a percentage amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index from January 1, 2024, to January 1, 2029. Subsequent fifth fiscal year adjustments shall cover subsequent five-year periods. The incremental change shall be added to the previously adjusted amount.

(c) Whenever a reduction of fees, or penalties, or total fees and penalties in settlement in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved pursuant to this section, there shall be placed on file, for at least one year, in the office of the director of the department a public record with respect to that settlement. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name or names of the feepayers who are parties to the settlement.

(2) The total amount in dispute.

(3) The amount agreed to pursuant to the settlement.

(4) A summary of the reasons why the settlement is in the best interests of the State of California.

(5) (A) For any settlement approved by the director, except those settlements approved pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the Attorney General’s conclusion as to whether the recommendation of settlement was reasonable from an overall perspective.

(B) The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secret, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure that, if disclosed, would adversely affect the
 feepayer or the national defense.

(d) The director shall not participate in the settlement of fee matters pursuant to this section, except as provided in subdivision (e).

(e) (1) Any recommendation for settlement shall be approved or disapproved by the director within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation to the director. Any recommendation for settlement that is not either approved or disapproved by the director within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation shall be deemed approved.

(2) Where the director disapproves a recommendation for settlement, at the discretion of the director and chief counsel, the matter shall be remanded
 to staff for further negotiation, and may be resubmitted to the director, in the same manner and subject to the same requirements as the initial
 submission.

(f) All settlements entered into pursuant to this section shall be final and nonappealable, except upon a showing of fraud or misrepresentation with respect to a material fact.

(g) The Legislature finds that it is essential for fiscal purposes that the settlement program authorized by this section be expeditiously implemented. Accordingly, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the department in implementing and administering the settlement program authorized by this section.

(h) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision
 shall apply to any settlements approved on or after January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 511, Sec. 34.   (SB 889)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.12.

(a) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall release any levy or notice to withhold issued pursuant to this part on any property in the event that the expense of the sale process exceeds the liability for which the levy is made.

(b) (1) (A) The Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may order the
 release of any levy or notice to withhold issued pursuant to this part or, within 90 days from the receipt of funds pursuant to a levy or notice to withhold, order the return of any amount up to two thousand three hundred dollars ($2,300) of moneys received, upon his or her finding that the levy or notice to withhold threatens the health or welfare of the feepayer or his or her spouse and dependents or family.

(B) The amount the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may return to each taxpayer subject to a levy or notice to withhold, is limited to two thousand three hundred dollars ($2,300), or the adjusted amount as specified in paragraph (2), in any monthly period.

(C) The Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may order amounts returned in the case of a seizure of property as a result of a jeopardy determination, subject to the amounts set or adjusted pursuant to this section and if the ultimate
 collection of the amount due is no longer in jeopardy.

(2) (A) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall adjust the two-thousand-three-hundred-dollar ($2,300) amount specified in paragraph (1) as follows:

(i) On or before March 1, 2016, and on or before March 1 each year thereafter, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall multiply the amount applicable for the current fiscal year by the inflation factor adjustment calculated based on the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index, as recorded by the California Department of Industrial Relations for the most recent year available, and the formula set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 17041. The resulting amount will be the applicable amount for the succeeding fiscal year only when the applicable amount computed is equal to or exceeds a new
 operative threshold, as defined in subparagraph (B).

(ii) When the applicable amount equals or exceeds an operative threshold specified in subparagraph (B), the resulting applicable amount, rounded to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars ($100), shall be operative for purposes of paragraph (1) beginning July 1 of the succeeding fiscal year.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “operative threshold” means an amount that exceeds by at least one hundred dollars ($100) the greater of either the amount specified in paragraph (1) or the amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) as the operative adjustment to the amount specified in paragraph (1).

(c) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall not sell any seized property until it has first notified the fee payer in writing of the exemptions from
 levy under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), this section shall not apply to the seizure of any property as a result of a jeopardy determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 181, Sec. 10.   (SB 1507)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.13.

Exemptions from levy under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be adjusted for purposes of enforcing the collection of debts under this part to reflect changes in the California Consumer Price Index whenever the change is more than 5 percent higher than any previous adjustment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 179.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.14.

(a) A feepayer may file a claim with the board for reimbursement of bank charges and any other reasonable third-party check charge fees incurred by the feepayer as the direct result of an erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action by the board. Bank and third-party charges include a financial institution’s or third party’s customary charge for
 complying with the levy or notice to withhold instructions and reasonable charges for overdrafts that are a direct consequence of the erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action. The charges are those paid by the feepayer and not waived or reimbursed by the financial institution or third party. Each claimant applying for reimbursement shall file a claim with the board that shall be in a form as may be prescribed by the board. In order for the board to grant a claim, the board shall determine that both of the following conditions have been satisfied:

(1) The erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action was caused by board error.

(2) Prior to the erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action, the feepayer responded to all
 contacts by the board and provided the board with any requested information or documentation sufficient to establish the feepayer’s position. This provision may be waived by the board for reasonable cause.

(b) Claims pursuant to this section shall be filed within 90 days from the date the bank and third-party charges were incurred by the feepayer. Within 30 days from the date the claim is received, the board shall respond to the claim. If the board denies the claim, the feepayer shall be notified in writing of the reason or reasons for the denial of the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 253, Sec. 10.   (SB 442)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.15.

(a) At least 30 days prior to the filing or recording of liens under Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) or Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 7220) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the department shall mail to the fee payer a preliminary notice. The notice shall specify the statutory authority of the department for filing or recording the lien, indicate the earliest date on which the lien may be filed or recorded, and state the remedies available to the fee payer to prevent the filing or recording of the lien. In the event fee liens are filed for the same liability in multiple counties, only one preliminary notice shall be sent.

(b) The preliminary notice required by this section shall not be
 required with respect to jeopardy determinations issued under Article 4 (commencing with Section 50120.1) of Chapter 3.

(c) If the department determines that the filing of a lien was in error, it shall mail a release to the fee payer and the entity recording the lien as soon as possible, but no later than seven days, after this determination and receipt of lien recording information. The release shall contain a statement that the lien was filed in error. In the event the erroneous lien is obstructing a lawful transaction, the department shall immediately issue a release of lien to the fee payer and the entity recording the lien.

(d) When the department releases a lien that has been erroneously filed, notice of that release shall be mailed to the fee payer and, upon the request of the fee payer, a copy of the release shall be mailed to the major credit reporting companies in the
 county where the lien was filed.

(e) (1) The department may release or subordinate a lien if the department determines any of the following:

(A) Release or subordination will facilitate the collection of the fee liability.

(B) Release or subordination will be in the best interest of the state and the fee payer.

(C) Release or subordination will be in the best interest of the state and another person that is not the taxpayer but that holds an interest with the taxpayer in the property that is subject to the lien.

(2) The amendments added to this subdivision do not constitute a change in, and are declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 96.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.16.

(a) If any officer or employee of the board recklessly disregards board-published procedures, a fee payer aggrieved by that action or omission may bring an action for damages against the State of California in superior court.

(b) In any action brought under subdivision (a), upon finding of liability on the part of the State of California, the state shall be liable to the plaintiff in an amount equal to the sum of all of the following:

(1) Actual and direct monetary damages sustained by the plaintiff as a result of the actions or omissions.

(2) Reasonable litigation costs including any of the following:

(A) Reasonable court costs.

(B) Prevailing market rates for the kind or quality of services furnished in connection with any of the following:

(i) The reasonable expenses of expert witnesses in connection with the civil proceeding, except that no expert witness shall be compensated at a rate in excess of the highest rate of compensation for expert witnesses paid by the State of California.

(ii) The reasonable cost of any study, analysis, engineering report,
 test, or project that is found by the court to be necessary for the preparation of the party’s case.

(iii) Reasonable fees paid or incurred for the services of attorneys in connection with the civil proceeding, except that those fees shall not be in excess of seventy-five dollars ($75) per hour unless the court determines that an increase in the cost of living or a special factor, such as the limited availability of qualified attorneys for the proceeding, justifies a higher rate.

(c) In the awarding of damages under subdivision (b), the court shall take into consideration the negligence or omissions, if any, on the part of the plaintiff that contributed to the damages.

(d) Whenever it appears to the court that the fee payer’s position in the proceeding brought under subdivision (a) is frivolous, the court may impose
 a penalty against the plaintiff in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000). A penalty so imposed shall be paid upon notice and demand from the board and shall be collected as a tax imposed under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 181.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.17.

(a) Except in any case where the board finds collection of the fee to be in jeopardy, if any property has been levied upon, the property or the proceeds from the sale of the property shall be returned to the fee payer if the board determines any one of the following:

(1) The levy on the property was not in accordance with the law.

(2) The fee payer has entered into and is in compliance with an installment
 payment agreement pursuant to Section 50138.6 to satisfy the fee liability for which the levy was imposed, unless that or another agreement allows for the levy.

(3) The return of the property will facilitate the collection of the fee liability or will be in the best interest of the state and the fee payer.

(b) Property returned under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) is subject to the provisions of Section 50156.14.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 929, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.18.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2003, the director the department, or their delegates, may compromise any final fee liability.

(b) For purposes of this section, “a final fee liability” means any final fee liability arising under Part 26 (commencing with Section 50101), or related interest, additions to the fee, penalties, or other amounts assessed under this part.

(c) (1) Offers in compromise shall be considered only for liabilities that were generated from a business that has been discontinued or transferred, where the feepayer making the offer no longer has a controlling interest or association with the transferred business or has a controlling interest or association with a similar
 type of business as the transferred or discontinued business.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a qualified final fee liability may be compromised regardless of whether the business has been discontinued or transferred or whether the feepayer has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business as the transferred or discontinued business. All other provisions of this section that apply to a final fee liability shall also apply to a qualified final fee liability, and a compromise shall not be made under this subdivision unless all other requirements of this section are met. For purposes of this subdivision, a “qualified final fee liability” means that part of a final fee liability, including related interest, additions to the fee, penalties, or other amounts assessed under this part, arising from a transaction or transactions in which the department finds no evidence that the owner of the underground storage tank collected
 underground storage tank maintenance fee reimbursement from the operator of the underground storage tank or other person and which was determined against the feepayer under Article 2 (commencing with Section 50113) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 50114) of Chapter 3.

(3) A qualified final fee liability may not be compromised with any of the following:

(A) A feepayer who previously received a compromise under paragraph (2) for a liability, or a part thereof, arising from a transaction or transactions that are substantially similar to the transaction or transactions attributable to the liability for which the feepayer is making the offer.

(B) A business that was transferred by a feepayer who previously received a compromise under paragraph (2) and who has a controlling interest or association with the transferred
 business, when the liability for which the offer is made is attributable to a transaction or transactions substantially similar to the transaction or transactions for which the feepayer’s liability was previously compromised.

(C) A business in which a feepayer who previously received a compromise under paragraph (2) has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business for which the feepayer received the compromise, when the liability of the business making the offer arose from a transaction or transactions substantially similar to the transaction or transactions for which the feepayer’s liability was previously compromised.

(d) The department may, in its discretion, enter into a written agreement that permits the feepayer to pay the compromise in installments for a period not exceeding one year. The agreement may provide that such installments shall be paid by
 electronic funds transfers or any other means to facilitate the payment of each installment.

(e) A feepayer that has received a compromise under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) may be required to enter into any collateral agreement that is deemed necessary for the protection of the interests of the state. A collateral agreement may include a provision that allows the department to reestablish the liability, or any portion thereof, if the feepayer has sufficient annual income during the succeeding five-year period. The department shall establish criteria for determining “sufficient annual income” for purposes of this subdivision.

(f) A feepayer that has received a compromise under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) shall file and pay by the due date all subsequently required underground storage tank maintenance fee returns for a five-year period from the date the liability is
 compromised, or until the feepayer is no longer required to file underground storage tank maintenance fee returns, whichever period is earlier.

(g) For amounts to be compromised under this section, the following conditions shall exist:

(1) The feepayer shall establish that:

(A) The amount offered in payment is the most that can be expected to be paid or collected from the feepayer’s present assets or income.

(B) The feepayer does not have reasonable prospects of acquiring increased income or assets that would enable the feepayer to satisfy a greater amount of the liability than the amount offered, within a reasonable period of time.

(2) The department shall have determined that acceptance
 of the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

(h) A determination by the department that it would not be in the best interest of the state to accept an offer in compromise in satisfaction of a final fee liability shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(i) When an offer in compromise is either accepted or rejected, or the terms and conditions of a compromise agreement are fulfilled, the department shall notify the feepayer in writing. In the event an offer is rejected, the amount posted will either be applied to the liability or refunded, at the discretion of the feepayer.

(j) When more than one feepayer is liable for the debt, such as with spouses or partnerships or other business combinations, the acceptance of an offer in compromise from one liable feepayer shall not relieve the
 other feepayers from paying the entire liability. However, the amount of the liability shall be reduced by the amount of the accepted offer.

(k) Whenever a compromise of the fee or penalties or total fees and penalties in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved, there shall be placed on file for at least one year in the office of the director of the department a public record with respect to that compromise. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the feepayer.

(2) The amount of unpaid fees and related penalties, additions to fees, interest, or other amounts involved.

(3) The amount offered.

(4) A summary of the reason why the compromise
 is in the best interest of the state.

The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secrets, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure, that if disclosed, would adversely affect the feepayer or violate the confidentiality provisions of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 50159). A list shall not be prepared and releases shall not be distributed by the department in connection with these statements.

(l) A compromise made under this section may be rescinded, all compromised liabilities may be reestablished (without regard to any statute of limitations that otherwise may be applicable), and no portion of the amount offered in compromise refunded, if either of the following occurs:

(1) The department determines that a person did any of the following acts regarding
 the making of the offer:

(A) Concealed from the department property belonging to the estate of a feepayer or other person liable for the fee.

(B) Received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified a book, document, or record or made a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the feepayer or other person liable for the fee.

(2) The feepayer fails to comply with any of the terms and conditions relative to the offer.

(m) A person who, in connection with an offer or compromise under this section, or offer of that compromise to enter into that agreement, willfully does either of the following shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned pursuant to
 subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution:

(1) Conceals from an officer or employee of this state property belonging to the estate of a feepayer or other person liable in respect of the fee.

(2) Receives, withholds, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies a book, document, or record, or makes a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the feepayer or other person liable in respect of the fee.

(n) For purposes of this section, “person” means the feepayer, a member of the feepayer’s family, a corporation, agent, fiduciary, or representative of, or another individual or entity acting on behalf of, the feepayer, or another corporation or entity owned or controlled by the feepayer, directly or indirectly, or that owns or controls
 the feepayer, directly or indirectly.

(o) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 272, Sec. 13) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 97.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 98 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 474.)
-------------------------------------------

50156.18.

(a) The director of the department, or their delegates, may compromise any final fee liability.

(b) For purposes of this section, “a final fee liability” means any final fee liability arising under Part 26 (commencing with Section 50101), or related interest, additions to the fee, penalties, or other amounts assessed under this part.

(c) Offers in compromise shall be considered only for liabilities that were generated from a business that has been discontinued or transferred, where the feepayer making the offer no longer has a controlling interest or association with the transferred business or has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business as the transferred or
 discontinued business.

(d) For amounts to be compromised under this section, the following conditions shall exist:

(1) The feepayer shall establish that:

(A) The amount offered in payment is the most that can be expected to be paid or collected from the feepayer’s present assets or income.

(B) The feepayer does not have reasonable prospects of acquiring increased income or assets that would enable the feepayer to satisfy a greater amount of the liability than the amount offered, within a reasonable period of time.

(2) The department shall have determined that acceptance of the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

(e) A determination by the department that it would not be in the best interest of the state to accept an offer in compromise in satisfaction of a final fee liability shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(f) When an offer in compromise is either accepted or rejected, or the terms and conditions of a compromise agreement are fulfilled, the department shall notify the feepayer in writing. In the event an offer is rejected, the amount posted will either be applied to the liability or refunded, at the discretion of the feepayer.

(g) When more than one feepayer is liable for the debt, such as with spouses or partnerships or other business combinations, the acceptance of an offer in compromise from one liable feepayer shall not relieve the other feepayers from paying the entire liability. However, the amount of the liability shall be reduced by
 the amount of the accepted offer.

(h) Whenever a compromise of the fee or penalties or total fees and penalties in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved, there shall be placed on file for a least one year in the office of the director of the department a public record with respect to that compromise. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the feepayer.

(2) The amount of unpaid fees and related penalties, additions to fees, interest, or other amounts involved.

(3) The amount offered.

(4) A summary of the reason why the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

The public record shall not
 include any information that relates to any trade secrets, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure, that if disclosed, would adversely affect the feepayer or violate the confidentiality provisions of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 50159). A list shall not be prepared and releases shall not be distributed by the department in connection with these statements.

(i) A compromise made under this section may be rescinded, all compromised liabilities may be reestablished (without regard to any statute of limitations that otherwise may be applicable), and no portion of the amount offered in compromise refunded, if either of the following occurs:

(1) The department determines that a person did any of the following acts regarding the making of the offer:

(A) Concealed from
 the department property belonging to the estate of a feepayer or other person liable for the fee.

(B) Received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified a book, document, or record, or made any false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the feepayer or other person liable for the fee.

(2) The feepayer fails to comply with any of the terms and conditions relative to the offer.

(j) A person who, in connection with an offer or compromise under this section, or offer of that compromise to enter into that agreement, willfully does either of the following shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both, together with the costs of investigation and
 prosecution:

(1) Conceals from an officer or employee of this state property belonging to the estate of a feepayer or other person liable in respect of the fee.

(2) Receives, withholds, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies a book, document, or record, or makes a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the feepayer or other person liable in respect of the fee.
